Utah statutes.
67-16-5.   Accepting gift, compensation, or loan -- When prohibited.
(1)  As used in this section, "economic benefit tantamount to a gift"
includes:
(a)  a loan at an interest rate that is substantially lower than the
commercial rate then currently prevalent for similar loans; and
(b)  compensation received for private services rendered at a rate
substantially exceeding the fair market value of the services.
(2)  It is an offense for a public officer or public employee, under
circumstances not amounting to a violation of Section 63G-6-1001 or 76-8-105,
to knowingly receive, accept, take, seek, or solicit, directly or indirectly
for himself or another a gift of substantial value or a substantial economic
benefit tantamount to a gift:
(a)  that would tend improperly to influence a reasonable person in the
person's position to depart from the faithful and impartial discharge of the
person's public duties;
(b)  that the public officer or public employee knows or that a reasonable
person in that position should know under the circumstances is primarily for
the purpose of rewarding the public officer or public employee for official
action taken; or
(c)  if the public officer or public employee recently has been, is now, or in
the near future may be involved in any governmental action directly affecting
the donor or lender, unless a disclosure of the gift, compensation, or loan
and other relevant information has been made in the manner provided in Section
67-16-6.
(3)  Subsection (2) does not apply to:
(a)  an occasional nonpecuniary gift, having a value of not in excess of $50;
(b)  an award publicly presented in recognition of public services;
(c)  any bona fide loan made in the ordinary course of business; or
(d)  a political campaign contribution.
